src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
!! ---------------
!! The LUO language nouns inflect in cases.

LEXICON N_
+N: #;

LEXICON N_OT
+N+Sg: # ;

LEXICON Cases
+N+sg+nom:0     #   ;
+N+pl+nom:i     #   ;
+N+sg+loc:as    #   ;
+N+pl+loc:ias   #   ;
+N+sg+acc:at    #   ;
+N+pl+acc:iat   #   ;
#:0   Nouns   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
